Nevada, session 83, AB233.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 4.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, justice
courts have jurisdiction of the following civil actions and
proceedings and no others except as otherwise provided by specific
statute:
(a) In actions arising on contract for the recovery of money only,
if the sum claimed, exclusive of interest, does not exceed $15,000.
(b) In actions for damages for injury to the person, or for taking,
detaining or injuring personal property, or for injury to real property
where no issue is raised by the verified answer of the defendant
involving the title to or boundaries of the real property, if the
damage claimed does not exceed $15,000.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (l), in actions for
a fine, penalty or forfeiture not exceeding $15,000, given by statute
-
*AB233*

– 2 –
or the ordinance of a county, city or town, where no issue is raised
by the answer involving the legality of any tax, impost, assessment,
toll or municipal fine.
(d) In actions upon bonds or undertakings conditioned for the
payment of money, if the sum claimed does not exceed $15,000,
though the penalty may exceed that sum. Bail bonds and other
undertakings posted in criminal matters may be forfeited regardless
of amount.
(e) In actions to recover the possession of personal property, if
the value of the property does not exceed $15,000.
(f) To take and enter judgment on the confession of a defendant,
when the amount confessed, exclusive of interest, does not exceed
$15,000.
(g) Of actions for the possession of lands and tenements where
the relation of landlord and tenant exists, when damages claimed do
not exceed $15,000 or when no damages are claimed.
(h) Of actions when the possession of lands and tenements has
been unlawfully or fraudulently obtained or withheld, when
damages claimed do not exceed $15,000 or when no damages are
claimed.
(i) Of suits for the collection of taxes, where the amount of the
tax sued for does not exceed $15,000.
(j) Of actions for the enforcement of mechanics’ liens, where the
amount of the lien sought to be enforced, exclusive of interest, does
not exceed $15,000.
(k) Of actions for the enforcement of liens of owners of facilities
for storage, where the amount of the lien sought to be enforced,
exclusive of interest, does not exceed $15,000.
(l) In actions for a civil penalty imposed for a violation of
NRS 484D.680.
(m) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, in any
action for the issuance of a temporary or extended order for
protection against domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.020. A
justice court does not have jurisdiction in an action for the issuance
of a temporary or extended order for protection against domestic
violence:
(1) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more and less
than 700,000;
(2) In any township whose population is 100,000 or more
located within a county whose population is 700,000 or more;
(3) If a district court issues a written order to the justice court
requiring that further proceedings relating to the action for the
issuance of the order for protection be conducted before the district
court; or
-
*AB233*

– 3 –
(4) Where the adverse party against whom the order is
sought is under 18 years of age.
(n) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, in any action
for the issuance of an emergency or extended order for protection
against high-risk behavior pursuant to NRS 33.570 or 33.580. A
justice court does not have jurisdiction in an action for the issuance
of an emergency or extended order for protection against high-risk
behavior:
(1) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more but less
than 700,000;
(2) In any township whose population is 100,000 or more
located within a county whose population is 700,000 or more;
(3) If a district court issues a written order to the justice court
requiring that further proceedings relating to the action for the
issuance of the order for protection be conducted before the district
court; or
(4) Where the adverse party against whom the order is
sought is under 18 years of age.
(o) In an action for the issuance of a temporary or extended
order for protection against harassment in the workplace pursuant to
NRS 33.200 to 33.360, inclusive, where the adverse party against
whom the order is sought is 18 years of age or older.
(p) In small claims actions under the provisions of chapter 73 of
NRS.
(q) In actions to contest the validity of liens on mobile homes or
manufactured homes.
(r) In any action pursuant to NRS 200.591 for the issuance of a
protective order against a person alleged to be committing the crime
of stalking, aggravated stalking or harassment where the adverse
party against whom the order is sought is 18 years of age or older.
(s) In any action pursuant to NRS 200.378 for the issuance of a
protective order against a person alleged to have committed the
crime of sexual assault where the adverse party against whom the
order is sought is 18 years of age or older.
(t) In actions transferred from the district court pursuant to
NRS 3.221.
(u) In any action for the issuance of a temporary or extended
order pursuant to NRS 33.400.
(v) In any action seeking an order pursuant to NRS 441A.195.
(w) In any action to determine whether a person has committed
a civil infraction punishable pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive.
2. The jurisdiction conferred by this section does not extend to
civil actions, other than for forcible entry or detainer, in which the
-
*AB233*

– 4 –
title of real property or mining claims or questions affecting the
boundaries of land are involved.
3. Justice courts have jurisdiction of all misdemeanors and no
other criminal offenses except as otherwise provided by specific
statute. A justice court may, upon approval of the district court,
transfer original jurisdiction of a misdemeanor to the district court
for the purpose of assigning an offender to a program established:
(a) By the district court pursuant to:
(1) NRS 176A.250, if the justice court:
(I) Has not established its own program pursuant to that
section; or
(II) Determines that the transfer is appropriate and
necessary; or
(2) NRS 176A.280, if the justice court has not established its
own program pursuant to that section; or
(b) Pursuant to NRS 433A.335, if the offender is eligible to
receive assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to that section.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 , [and] 6 [,]
and 7, in criminal cases the jurisdiction of justices of the peace
extends to the limits of their respective counties.
5. A justice of the peace may conduct a pretrial release hearing:
(a) For a person located outside of the township of the justice of
the peace.
(b) Pursuant to an interlocal agreement, in a municipal court.
6. Each justice court has jurisdiction of any violation of a
regulation governing vehicular traffic on an airport within the
township in which the court is established.
7. In the case of any arrest made by a member of the Nevada
Highway Patrol, the jurisdiction of the justices of the peace
extends to the limits of their respective counties and to the limits of
all counties which have common boundaries with their respective
counties.
H
-
*AB233*